Illinois, session 104th, HB4372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-505 and by adding Section 27-550 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-505)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-21)7    Sec. 27-505. History of the United States. 8    (a) History of the United States shall be taught in all 9public schools and in all other educational institutions in 10this State supported or maintained, in whole or in part, by 11public funds. 12    The teaching of history shall have as one of its 13objectives the imparting to pupils of a comprehensive idea of 14our democratic form of government and the principles for which 15our government stands as regards other nations, including the 16studying of the place of our government in world-wide 17movements and the leaders thereof, with particular stress upon 18the basic principles and ideals of our representative form of 19government. 20    The teaching of history shall include a study of the role 21and contributions of African Americans and other ethnic 22groups, including, but not restricted to, Native Americans, 23Polish, Lithuanian, German, Hungarian, Irish, Bohemian,   HB4372 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16674 LNS 30078 b1Russian, Albanian, Italian, Czech, Slovak, French, Scots, 2Latin Americans, Hispanics, Asian Americans, etc., in the 3history of this country and this State. To reinforce the study 4of the role and contributions of Hispanics, such curriculum 5shall include the study of the events related to the forceful 6removal and illegal deportation of Mexican-American U.S. 7citizens during the Great Depression.8    The teaching of history shall also include teaching about 9Native American nations' sovereignty and self-determination, 10both historically and in the present day, with a focus on urban 11Native Americans.12    In public schools only, the teaching of history shall 13include a study of the roles and contributions of lesbian, 14gay, bisexual, and transgender people in the history of this 15country and this State. 16    The teaching of history also shall include a study of the 17role of labor unions and their interaction with government in 18achieving the goals of a mixed free enterprise system. 19    Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, the teaching of 20history must also include instruction on the history of 21Illinois. 22    The teaching of history shall include the contributions 23made to society by Americans of different faith practices, 24including, but not limited to, Native Americans, Muslim 25Americans, Jewish Americans, Christian Americans, Hindu 26Americans, Sikh Americans, Buddhist Americans, and any other   HB4372 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16674 LNS 30078 b1collective community of faith that has shaped America. 2    (b) No pupils shall be graduated from the eighth grade of 3any public school unless the pupils have received instruction 4in the history of the United States as provided in this Section 5and give evidence of having a comprehensive knowledge thereof, 6which may be administered remotely. 7    (c) Instructional materials that include the addition of 8content related to Native Americans shall be prepared by the 9State Superintendent of Education and made available to all 10school boards on the State Board of Education's Internet 11website no later than July 1, 2024. These instructional 12materials may be used by school boards as guidelines for the 13development of instruction under this Section; however, each 14school board shall itself determine the minimum amount of 15instructional time for satisfying the requirements of this 16Section. Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this 17Section, a school or other educational institution is not 18required to teach and a pupil is not required to learn the 19additional content related to Native Americans until 20instructional materials are made available on the State 21Board's Internet website.      22    Instructional materials related to Native Americans shall 23be developed in consultation with members of the Chicago 24American Indian Community Collaborative who are members of a 25federally recognized tribe, are documented descendants of 26Indigenous communities, or are other persons recognized as   HB4372 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16674 LNS 30078 b1contributing community members by the Chicago American Indian 2Community Collaborative and who currently reside in this 3State. 4(Source: P.A. 103-422, eff. 8-4-23; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 5104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-550 new)7    Sec. 27-550. Latine studies. 8    (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, every public 9elementary and high school shall include in its curriculum the 10study of the contributions made by Latin Americans to the 11economic, cultural, social, and political development of the 12United States. The instruction shall include the events of the 13Latine experience and Latin American history, including the 14contributions made by Latin Americans in government and the 15arts, humanities, and sciences, as well as the effects of 16colonialism in society.17    (b) The State Superintendent of Education may prepare and 18make available to all school boards instructional resources 19and professional development opportunities that may be used as 20guidelines for the development of a unit of study under this 21Section. However, each school board shall determine the 22minimum amount of instructional time that qualifies as a unit 23of study satisfying the requirements of this Section.24    (c) The regional superintendent of schools shall monitor a 25school district's compliance with the requirements of this   HB4372 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16674 LNS 30078 b1Section during the regional superintendent's compliance visit 2and make recommendations for improvement, including 3professional development. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.